District of Columbia statutes.
4-754.25

Additional standards for providers of transitional housing.

In addition to the requirements of §§ 4-754.21, 4-754.22, 4-754.23, and 4-754.24, all providers of transitional housing shall provide:

(1)

Follow-up supportive services, for a minimum of 6 months, for clients who have transferred to permanent housing from their program, unless the client is receiving such supportive services from another provider;

(2)

An apartment-style or group home housing accommodation; and

(3)

Access to private space and personal time.

History

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 16, 52 DCR 8113